Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 1 In General

§ 5-1-101.
Qualifications of judges of supreme court and district court.

No person shall be eligible
for election or appointment to the office of justice of the supreme
court, or to the office of judge of the district court, unless he
shall possess the qualifications prescribed for such office by the
constitution of the state of Wyoming and shall have practiced law
in the state of Wyoming at least one (1) year immediately preceding
his election or appointment.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 100, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 5-1.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications of supreme court justices, see art. 5, § 8, Wyo. Const.

As to qualifications of district court judges, see art. 5, § 12, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of age requirement for state public office, 90 ALR3d 900.

§ 5-1-102.
Terms of
judicial nominating commission members; expenses; removal.

The terms of the elected and appointed voting members of the judicial nominating commission created by Article 5, Section 4, Wyoming Constitution, shall be four (4) years except the initial term for one (1) attorney and one (1) elector shall be two (2) years and the initial term for one (1) attorney and one (1) elector shall be three (3) years. The members of the Wyoming state bar initially elected to the commission shall draw lots to determine the term each shall serve. The governor shall designate whether the length of the term of electors he initially appoints to the commission shall be two (2), three (3) or four (4) years. The governor may remove any member he appoints as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The members of the judicial nominating commission, including any advisors, shall not receive any fees, salary or other compensation for services rendered but are entitled to receive per diem and mileage on the same basis and at the same rate as state employees and reimbursement for any other actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of commission duties.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 111, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-1.1; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses, see §§

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “The terms of all initial elected and appointed members shall begin on March 1, 1973.”

§ 5-1-103.
Terms of members of the commission on judicial conduct and ethics;
removal; expenses.

The terms of members of the commission on judicial conduct and ethics shall be those set out in Article 5, Section 6, Wyoming Constitution, and the rules adopted by the supreme court as authorized by that constitutional provision.

Members of the commission on judicial conduct and ethics may be removed in accordance with rules adopted by the supreme court in accordance with Article 5, Section 6, Wyoming Constitution. Members appointed to the commission by the governor may also be removed in accordance with W.S.

9-1-202

.

The members of the commission on judicial conduct and ethics shall not receive any fees, salary or other compensation for services rendered but are entitled to receive per diem and mileage on the same basis and at the same rate as state employees and reimbursement for any other actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the commission’s duties, but in any event such reimbursement shall not exceed funds specifically appropriated by the legislature for the benefit of the commission.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-1.2; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1997, ch. 126, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and travel expenses, see §§

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

.

§ 5-1-104.
Retroactive application of provisions as to qualifications.

This act shall have no
retroactive application, and shall not affect the incumbency of any
present district judge.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 100, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 5-2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “This act,” referred to in this section, mean Laws 1957, ch. 100, which appears as §§

5-1-101

,

5-1-104

and

5-3-102

.

§ 5-1-105.
Salaries of justices of supreme court and judges of district courts.

Subject to the provisions
of article 5, section 17 of the Wyoming constitution as amended, the justices of the supreme court and the
judges of the district court shall receive annual salaries as provided
by law which shall be paid in monthly installments at the end of each
month, and upon request, the state auditor shall draw warrants upon
the state treasurer accordingly, in favor of said justices and judges.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 12, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 890; C.S. 1920, § 1119; Laws 1921, ch. 72, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 31-115; C.S. 1945, § 1-113; Laws 1949, ch. 65, § 1; 1953, ch. 101, § 1; 1957, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-3; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 1; 1963, ch. 116, § 16; 1965, ch. 115, § 1; 1969, ch. 168, § 5.

§ 5-1-106.
Retirement
of judges of the supreme court or district courts; pension; assignment
of retired judges.

A judge of the supreme court or district courts shall retire when he attains the age of seventy (70) years. A judge is eligible for retirement when he has served as a judge of the supreme court, a district court or both for:

Not less than eighteen (18) years;

Not less than fifteen (15) years and is sixty-five (65) years of age or more;

Not less than twelve (12) years and is seventy (70) years of age or more;

Not less than six (6) consecutive years and is sixty-five (65) years of age or more;

Less than six (6) years but continuously from the date of appointment to the age of seventy (70) years;

Not less than twelve (12) years and is fifty-five (55) years of age or more;

Not less than six (6) years and dies in office or is retired by the supreme court for disability.

Retired judges shall receive a maximum lifetime annual pension of fifty percent (50%) of the salary currently authorized by law for judges of the court from which they retired. The pension of a judge retiring under paragraph (a)(iv), (v), (vi) or (vii) of this section shall be that proportion of the maximum allowable pension which the aggregate number of years of his judicial service bears to eighteen (18) years. The pension shall increase or diminish proportionately as salaries of judges of the respective courts change. The pension of any judge who retires under paragraph (a)(iv) of this section at the age of seventy (70) with not less than six (6) but less than twelve (12) years service shall be that proportion of the maximum allowable pension which the aggregate number of years of judicial service bears to twelve (12) years.

To retire and receive a pension, a judge shall notify in writing the governor and the state auditor the date he elects to retire and shall furnish with the notice an affidavit showing the date and place of his birth and his service as a judge entitling him to a pension, provided, that a judge whose service is terminated by expiration of the term for which he is elected or appointed and whose service is such as to otherwise entitle him to receive the pension herein provided, shall be deemed to have retired.

This section shall apply to judges who were appointed prior to July 1, 1998 and to judges who have retired and are receiving benefits under this section. Judicial retirement for justices and judges appointed to the bench on or after July 1, 1998 is provided pursuant to W.S.

9-3-701

through

9-3-713

.

Any judge who is otherwise eligible to receive a pension may receive the benefits accorded by this section if he retires on the day of attainment of the age of seventy (70) years, or prior thereto, provided that if he is a judge on the effective date of this act, he may complete the present term for which he was elected or appointed without the loss of any pension benefits accorded by this section.

Any justice of the supreme court or district court judge of this state, who has retired pursuant to the provisions of this section, and who is not practicing law, may, notwithstanding his retirement, be called upon, with his consent, at the request of a district court judge, with the consent of the chief justice, or by the chief justice, and assigned to service on any court. A retired justice or judge shall receive as a salary during any period of assignment an amount equal to the current compensation of a judge of the court to which he is assigned. The salary received by a retired justice or judge during any period of assignment shall not affect the receipt of any retirement allowance received by the retired justice or judge during the period of assignment. Assignments of retired justices or judges under this section shall only be made in a manner that does not jeopardize the qualified status of state retirement plans established by the Wyoming legislature. When called to serve, a retired judge or justice shall receive the same per diem and travel allowances as allowed active judges or justices. Per diem, allowances and compensation shall be paid from the contingent fund of the court to which the judge or justice is assigned.

In lieu of the service retirement allowances provided in subsection (b) of this section, any judge specified in subsection (a) of this section may elect one (1) of the following forms of retirement benefits which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the allowance to which he would otherwise be entitled as determined by the actuary for the state retirement system:

A full joint and survivor benefit which provides reduced monthly service retirement benefit payments during the retired member’s life and upon his death after retirement continues payments in the same reduced amount to a designated beneficiary during the life of that beneficiary;

A half joint and survivor benefit which provides reduced monthly service retirement benefit payments during the retired member’s life and upon his death after retirement continues payments, in the amount of one-half (1/2) of such reduced amount, to the designated beneficiary during the life of that beneficiary.

A judge who is eligible for retirement may elect one (1) of the retirement benefit forms in subsection (g) of this section during the time the judge is serving in office. Payment of the pension or survivor benefit shall commence upon the retirement of the judge or upon the death of the judge while serving in office, based on the years of service at retirement or death in office. If a survivor benefit was elected as provided in paragraph (g) of this section by a judge who is no longer in active service and dies before retirement, the survivor benefit shall commence upon the earliest date the judge would have been eligible to retire unless the designated beneficiary elects a later date.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 31-116; C.S. 1945, § 1-114; Laws 1949, ch. 118, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 203, § 1; 1957, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-4; Laws 1963, ch. 136, § 1; 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 5, § 1; 1979, ch. 39, § 1; 1981, ch. 56, § 1; ch. 96, § 1; 1983, ch. 55, § 1; 1992, ch. 62, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2006, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 36, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to assignment of retired judge by chief justice of the supreme court in case of death of district judge or other emergencies, see §

5-3-107

.

As to Wyoming retirement system generally, see §

9-3-401

et seq.

The 2004 amendment,

in (d) and (e), substituted “section” for “act” or a variation.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2006 amendment

rewrote (d) to clarify judicial retirement.

Laws 2006, ch. 32, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (f), substituted “his” for “such” and substituted “an amount equal to” for “the difference between his retirement allowance as provided by law and” in the second sentence, inserted the third sentence, and made a stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

The words “the effective date of this act” in subsection (e) refer to the effective date of Laws 1971, ch. 137, which carried no provision as to its effective date, but was enacted at a session that adjourned on February 20, 1971. See §

8-1-108

.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 36, § 2 provides as follows: “For the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2008, there is appropriated from the general fund to the Wyoming Supreme Court fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00).”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Spriggs v. Copenhaver, 459 P.2d 203,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1969); Jackson v. State, 624 P.2d 751,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1981); Morris v. Farmers Ins. Exch., 771 P.2d 1206,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1989); State v. Hat Bar Cattle Co. (In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River Sys.), 2015 WY 126,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Sept. 16, 2015); Robert L. Kroenlein Trust v. Kirchhefer, 2015 WY 127,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Sept. 17, 2015); Scherf v. State (In re Scherf), 2015 WY 130,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Sept. 23, 2015); Pope v. Rosenberg, 2015 WY 142,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Nov. 12, 2015); N. Fork Land & Cattle, LLLP v. First Am. Title Ins. Co., 2015 WY 150,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Nov. 24, 2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statutory classifications based on population, governmental employee salary or pension statutes, 96 ALR3d 538.